Wisconsin, session 2025, AB289.
do enact as follows:AB289,13Section 1. 29.601 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:AB289,1,6429.601 (4m) Use of insecticides. (a) The department may not use any 5insecticide from the neonicotinoid class on land that is acquired and maintained by 6the department as provided under s. 23.09 (2) (d).AB289,2,41(b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to insecticides from the neonicotinoid class 2that are used pursuant to a cooperative farming agreement or contract that the 3department entered into prior to the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB 4inserts date].AB289,2,75(c) Paragraph (a) does not apply to insecticides from the neonicotinoid class 6that are used for forest insect control on forested lands, state forest nurseries, or 7seed orchards or in designated zones of infestation as provided under s. 26.30 (7) (a).AB289,2,88